Washington statutes.
RCW 26.30.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

(2) "Educational institution" means any university, college, community college, junior college, high school, technical, vocational, or professional school, or similar institution, wherever located, which has been accredited by the Northwest Association of Higher and Secondary Institutions or approved by the state agency having regulatory powers over the class of schools to which the school belongs, or accredited or approved by the appropriate official, department, or agency of the state in which the institution is located.

(3) "Educational loan" means a loan or other aid or assistance for the purpose of furthering the obligor's education at an educational institution.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 4 s 1.]

NOTES:

Student financial aid program: Chapter 28B.92 RCW.